Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Chapter 14 Mine Product Taxes

Cross references. —

As to duty of joint revenue committee to submit a report every fourth year to the governor and legislature, reviewing the distribution formulae for federal mineral royalties, severance taxes and inheritance taxes, see §

28-1-118

.

As to mines and minerals generally, see title 30.

Refund of LUST tax. —

Laws 2001, ch. 129, § 2, provides that all severance taxes distributed under title 39, chapter 14, to the corrective action account created by §

35-11-1424

and the financial responsibility account created by §

35-11-1427

are to be in the amount of fuel taxes collected under § 39-17-104(c) and § 39-17-204(b), less any refunds.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

47A C.J.S. Internal Revenue § 267.